tr: İş ve Endüstri > Perakende > Para İşlemleri: Banknot Kontrol Cihazları; Yazarkasa ve POS Terminali Aksesuarları; Yazarkasalar ve POS Terminalleri; Bozuk Para ve Banknot Sayma Makineleri; Para Bozma Makineleri; Para Torbaları; Bozuk Para Ambalaj Kağıtları ve Deste Bantları
nb: Forretninger og industri > Detaljhandel > Pengehåndtering: Seddelbekreftelse; Tilbehør for kontantkasser og POS-terminaler; Kontantkasser og POS-terminaler; Mynt- og seddeltellere; Pengevekslere; Pengeinnskuddsposer; Myntpapir og seddelstropper
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Retail > Geldverwerking: Controleapparaten voor bankbiljetten; Accessoires voor kassa's en betaalautomaten; Kassa's en betaalautomaten; Tellers voor munten en bankbiljetten; Geldwisselaars; Geldzakjes; Papieren wikkels voor munten en bandjes voor bankbiljetten
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 소매 > 금전 처리: 지폐 식별기; 금전등록기/POS 단말기 부대용품; 금전등록기/POS 단말기; 동전/지폐 계수기; 동전 교환기; 현금 파우치; 동전 포장지/지폐 띠지
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 零售业 > 货币处理: 验钞机; 收银机与POS终端配件; 收银机与POS终端; 点币机与点钞机; 货币兑换机; 存钱袋; 硬币包装纸/捆钞带
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Maloprodaja > Rukovanje novcem: Ovjerivači novčanica; Pribor za registarske blagajne i POS uređaje; Registarske blagajne i POS uređaji; Brojači kovanica i novčanica; Automatska mjenjačnica; Torbe za polog novca; Papirnati omoti za novčiće i trake za novčanice
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 零售 > 錢鈔管理用具: 驗鈔機; 收銀機和 POS 系統配件; 收銀機和 POS 系統; 數幣/數鈔機; 零錢兌換機; 存款袋; 硬幣包裝紙/綁鈔帶
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Retail > Manipularea banilor: Dispozitive de verificare a bancnotelor; Case de marcat și accesorii pentru terminale POS; Case de marcat și terminale POS; Numărătoare de monede și bancnote; Dispozitive de schimbare a banilor; Saci pentru bani; Ambalaje pentru monede din hârtie și benzi pentru bancnote
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Trgovina > Upravljanje z denarjem: Aparati za preverjanje denarja; Dodatki za blagajne in POS terminale; Blagajne in POS terminali; Števci kovancev in bankovcev; Menjalci denarja; Vrečke za polog denarja; Papirnati ovitki za kovance in trakovi za bankovce
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Commerce de détail > Manipulation de l’argent: Détecteurs de faux billets; Accessoires pour caisses enregistreuses et terminaux de point de vente; Caisses enregistreuses et terminaux de point de vente; Compteurs de pièces et de billets; Distributeurs de monnaie; Pochettes de dépôt d’argent; Tubes de monnaie et bracelets pour billets
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การค้าปลีก > การจัดการเรื่องเงิน: เครื่องตรวจสอบธนบัตร; อุปกรณ์เครื่องบันทึกการเก็บเงินและ POS เทอร์มินัล; เครื่องบันทึกการเก็บเงินและ POS เทอร์มินัล; เครื่องนับเหรียญและธนบัตร; เครื่องแลกเหรียญ; ถุงเก็บเงิน; ที่รัดธนบัตรและกระดาษห่อเหรียญ
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Retalho > Manuseamento de dinheiro: Verificadores de notas; Acessórios de caixas registadoras e terminais de POS; Caixas registadoras e terminais de POS; Dispositivos de contagem de moedas e notas; Trocadores de dinheiro; Sacos de depósito de dinheiro; Embrulhos de papel para moedas e fitas para notas
it: Commercio e industria > Negozi > Gestione del denaro: Verificatori di banconote; Accessori per terminali POS e registratori di cassa; Terminali POS e registratori di cassa; Contamonete e contabanconote; Cambiavalute; Borse per deposito denaro; Involucri di carta per monete e fascette banconote
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Jälleenmyynti > Rahan käsittely: Setelien tarkastuslaitteet; Kassakoneiden ja maksupäätteiden lisätarvikkeet; Kassakoneet ja maksupäätteet; Seteli- ja kolikkolaskurit; Rahanvaihtajat; Rahan talletuspussit; Kolikko- ja setelikääreet
sv: Företag och industri > Detaljhandel > Pengahantering: Sedelverifiering; Tillbehör till kassaapparater och butiksterminaler; Kassaapparater och butiksterminaler; Mynt- och sedelräknare; Valutaväxling; Depositionspåsar för kontanter; Myntrör och sedelband
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Prodejny > Peněžnictví: Ověřovače pravosti bankovek; Příslušenství k pokladnám a prodejním terminálům; Pokladny a prodejní terminály; Počítačky mincí a bankovek; Měniče peněz; Vaky na peníze; Papírové obaly na mince a pásky na bankovky
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 小売 > レジスター・貨幣処理: 偽札検知器; キャッシュレジスター・POS端末関連用品; キャッシュレジスター・POS端末; 硬貨・紙幣計数機; 両替機; 鍵付セキュリティポーチ; 硬貨包装紙・紙幣用帯
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Розничная торговля > Счетно-денежное оборудование: Детекторы банкнот; Аксессуары для контрольно-кассовых аппаратов и POS-терминалов; Контрольно-кассовые аппараты и POS-терминалы; Счетчики монет и банкнот; Автоматы для размена денег; Инкассаторские сумки; Бумажная упаковка для монет и ленты для банкнот
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Bán lẻ > Xử lý tiền: Máy soi tiền; Phụ kiện thiết bị thanh toán tại điểm bán và máy đếm tiền; Máy đếm tiền và thiết bị thanh toán tại điểm bán; Máy đếm tiền xu và tiền giấy; Máy đổi tiền; Túi đựng tiền; Ống giấy đựng tiền xu & đai giấy bó tiền
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Търговия > Техника за пари: Детектори на банкноти; Аксесоари за касови апарати и ПОС терминали; Касови апарати и ПОС терминали; Броячи на монети и банкноти; Монетници; Торбички за паричен депозит; Хартиени опаковки за монети и ленти за банкноти
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Varejo > Manuseio de dinheiro: Verificadores de cédulas; Acessórios para terminais de ponto de venda e caixas registradoras; Terminais de ponto de venda e caixas registradoras; Contadores de moedas e notas; Máquinas de câmbio de dinheiro; Sacos para depósito de dinheiro; Envoltórios de papel para moedas e tiras de papel para notas
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Mažmeninė prekyba > Pinigų tvarkymas: Banknotų tikrintuvai; Kasos aparatai ir prekybos vietos terminalų priedai; Kasos aparatai ir prekybos vietos terminalai; Monetų ir banknotų skaičiuokliai; Pinigų keitimo aparatai; Inkasavimo maišai; Monetų vyniojimo popierius ir juostelės banknotams
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Kiskereskedelem > Pénzkezelés: Bankjegy-hitelesítők; Pénztárgép- és POS-terminál-kiegészítők; Pénztárgépek és POS-terminálok; Érme- és bankjegyszámlálók; Pénzváltók; Pénzbetétes táskák; Papír érmecsomagolók és bankjegypántok
en: Business & Industrial > Retail > Money Handling: Banknote Verifiers; Cash Register & POS Terminal Accessories; Cash Registers & POS Terminals; Coin & Bill Counters; Money Changers; Money Deposit Bags; Paper Coin Wrappers & Bill Straps
da: Erhverv og industri > Detail > Pengehåndteringssystemer: Pengeseddelkontrol; Tilbehør til kasseapparater og kasseterminaler; Kasseapparater og kasseterminaler; Mønt- og seddeltællere; Valutahandlere; Pengesække; Møntruller og seddelbanderoler
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Einzelhandel > Geldhandhabung: Geldscheinprüfgeräte; Zubehör für Ladenkassen & POS-Terminals; Ladenkassen & POS-Terminals; Geldzählmaschinen für Münzen und Scheine; Geldwechsler; Geldtaschen; Münzrollenpapier & Geldscheinbanderolen
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Sprzedaż detaliczna > Obrót środkami pieniężnymi: Testery do banknotów; Kasy fiskalne i produkty związane z obsługą terminali; Kasy fiskalne i elektroniczne terminale kasowe; Liczarki do pieniędzy; Rozmieniarki pieniędzy; Saszetki na pieniądze; Papierowe rolki na monety i banderole na monety
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Λιανικό εμπόριο > Διαχείριση χρημάτων: Επαληθευτές χαρτονομισμάτων; Αξεσουάρ ταμειακών μηχανών & τερματικών POS; Ταμειακές μηχανές και τερματικά POS; Καταμετρητές κερμάτων και χαρτονομισμάτων; Συσκευές αλλαγής χρημάτων; Τσάντες κατάθεσης χρημάτων; Χάρτινα περιτυλίγματα για κέρματα & δέστρες χαρτονομισμάτων
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Maloobchod > Manipulácia s peniazmi: Overovače bankoviek; Príslušenstvo registračnej pokladnice a POS terminálu; Registračné pokladnice a POS terminály; Počítadlá mincí a bankoviek; Predajný automat; Vaky na peniaze; Papierové obaly na mince a peňažné pásky
es: Economía e industria > Venta al por menor > Administración de dinero: Detectores de billetes; Accesorios para terminales de PdS y cajas registradoras; Terminales de PdS y cajas registradoras; Contadores de billetes y monedas; Cambistas; Bolsas de dinero; Envoltorios de monedas de papel y fajas para billetes